Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.020

Ethics in public contracting.

(1)(a) A state officer or employee of an agency who seeks to acquire goods or services or who participates in those contractual matters is subject to the requirements in RCW 42.52.150.

(b) A contractor who contracts with an agency to perform services related to the acquisition of goods and services for or on behalf of the state is subject to the requirements in RCW 42.52.150.

(2) No person or entity who seeks or may seek a contract with a state agency may give, loan, transfer, or deliver to any person something of economic value for which receipt of such item would cause a state officer or employee to be in a violation of RCW 42.52.040, 42.52.110, 42.52.120, 42.52.140, or 42.52.150.

[ 2012 c 224 s 3.]